Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-554
Fuel and feed; inspection and weighing.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to (1) provide for the inspection and weighing of hay, grain, and coal, and the measuring of wood and fuel to be used in the city or village, (2) regulate and prescribe the place or places for sale of hay, coal, and wood, and (3) fix the fees and duties of persons authorized to perform inspections under this section.

Laws 1879, § 69, XXIII, p. 215;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XXIII, p. 183;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XXIII, p. 174;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XXIII, p. 302;

R.S.1913, § 5128;

C.S.1922, § 4303;

C.S.1929, § 17-452;

R.S.1943, § 17-554;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 178.